Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Geologists Regulation Act, the definitions found in sections 81-3504 to 81-3519 shall be used.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 51;

Laws 2004, LB 890, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 3.